Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB711.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.001 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Administrator" means the chief executive officer of the institution;
(2) "Adult basic education" means instruction in mathematics, science, social studies,
reading, language arts, and related areas to enable individuals to better function in
society;
(3) "Benchmarks" means objective measures developed where applicable or practical
by the Council on Postsecondary Education to judge the performance of the
postsecondary education system and progress toward the goals as stated in KRS
164.003(2);
(4) "Board" or "governing board" means the board of trustees for the University of
Kentucky or the University of Louisville, the board of regents for a comprehensive
university, or the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System;
(5) "Board of regents" means the governing board of each comprehensive university
and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(6) ["Committee" means the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education created
in KRS 164.004;
(7) ]"Comprehensive university" means the following public institutions: Eastern
Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University,
Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, and Western Kentucky
University;
(7)[(8)] "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created in KRS
164.011;
(8)[(9)] "Customized training" means training in specific academic areas, work
Page 1 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
processes, or technical skills that are designed to serve a specific industry or
industries to upgrade worker skills;
(9)[(10)] "Goals" means the six (6) goals specified in KRS 164.003(2);
(10)[(11)] "Independent institution" means a nonpublic postsecondary education
institution in Kentucky whose instruction is not solely sectarian in nature, is
accredited by a regional accrediting association recognized by the United States
Department of Education, and is licensed by the Council on Postsecondary
Education;
(11)[(12)] "Institution" means a university, college, community college, health
technology center, vocational-technical school, technical institute, technical college,
technology center, or the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(12)[(13)] "Kentucky Community and Technical College System" means the system
composed of public community and technical colleges, including those
postsecondary institutions operated by the former Cabinet for Workforce
Development and those community colleges in the University of Kentucky
Community College System on May 30, 1997.
The system also includes institutions created by the board of regents for the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System and approved by the General
Assembly;
(13)[(14)] "Literacy" means an individual's ability to read, write, and speak in English
and compute and solve problems at levels of proficiency necessary to function on
the job and in society to achieve one's goals and develop one's knowledge and
potential;
(14)[(15)] "Lower division academic course" means any academic course offered for
college or university credit that is designated as a freshman or sophomore level
academic course;
(15)[(16)] "Nonteaching personnel" means any employee who is a full-time staff
Page 2 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
member, excluding a president, chancellor, vice president, academic dean,
academic department chair, or administrator;
(16)[(17)] "Postsecondary education system" means the following public institutions:
University of Kentucky, University of Louisville, Eastern Kentucky University,
Kentucky State University, Morehead State University, Murray State University,
Northern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky University, and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(17)[(18) "P-16 council" or "council of partners" means a local or state council that is
composed of educators from public and private preschools, elementary, secondary,
and postsecondary education institutions, local board of education members, and
may include community and business representatives that have voluntarily
organized themselves for the purpose of improving the alignment and quality of the
education continuum from preschool through postsecondary education as well as
student achievement at all levels;
(19)] "Public" means operated with state support;
(18)[(20)] "Relative" means a person's father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son,
daughter, aunt, uncle, son-in-law, or daughter-in-law;
(19)[(21) "Remedial education" means any program, course, or activity that is designed
specifically for students who have basic deficiencies in reading, written or oral
communication, mathematics, study skills, or other skills necessary to do beginning
postsecondary work as defined by the institution;
(22)] "Standardized degree program" means a program, approved by the Council on
Postsecondary Education, that consists of specific competencies, curriculum, and
performance requirements regardless of the providing institution;
(20)[(23)] "Strategic agenda" means the state strategic postsecondary education agenda
described in KRS 164.0203;
(21)[(24)] "Technical institution" means an educational institution that offers
Page 3 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
certificates, diplomas, or technical degrees in technical or occupational-related
programs, including a facility called a vocational-technical school, technical
institute, health technology center, technology center, technical college, or similar
designation; and
(22)[(25)] "Learning outcomes" means the knowledge, skills, and abilities that students
have attained as a result of their involvement in a particular set of educational
experiences.
Section 2. KRS 164.013 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall set the qualifications for the position
of president of the council. [Except for the first president appointed under
subsection (2) of this section, ]The council may employ a search firm and conduct a
nationwide search for candidates. Any search firm employed by the council shall
consider, interview, and propose three (3) or more candidates for the position of
president. The council may seek additional names from the search firm or from
other sources.
(2) [In the selection of candidates for the first president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education, the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education
shall serve as a search committee, employing a search firm for assistance. The
committee shall recommend three (3) candidates to be considered by the council
and shall repeat this process until it finds a satisfactory person to appoint as the first
president of the council.
(3) ]The president shall possess an excellent academic and administrative background,
have strong communication skills, have significant experience and an established
reputation as a professional in the field of postsecondary education, and shall not
express, demonstrate, or appear to have an institutional or regional bias in his or her
actions.
(3)[(4)] The president shall be the primary advocate for postsecondary education and
Page 4 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
advisor to the Governor and the General Assembly on matters of postsecondary
education in Kentucky. As the primary advocate for postsecondary education, the
president shall work closely with the [committee and the ]elected leadership of the
Commonwealth to ensure that they are fully informed about postsecondary
education issues and that the council fully understands the goals for postsecondary
education that the General Assembly has established in KRS 164.003(2).
(4)[(5)] The president may design and develop for review by the council new
statewide initiatives in accordance with the strategic agenda.
(5)[(6)] (a) The council shall set the salary of the president at an amount no greater
than the salary the president was receiving on January 1, 2012.
(b) The salary of the president shall be exempt from state employee salary
limitations as set forth in KRS 64.640.
(6)[(7)] The president shall be accorded a contract to serve for a term not to exceed
five (5) years, which is renewable at the pleasure of the council.
(7)[(8)] The president shall determine the staffing positions and organizational
structure necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the council and may employ
staff. All personnel positions of the Council on Higher Education, as of May 30,
1997, with the exception of the position of executive director, shall be transferred to
the Council on Postsecondary Education. All personnel shall be transferred at the
same salary and benefit levels. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 11A.040,
any person employed by the Council on Higher Education prior to May 30, 1997,
may accept immediate employment with any governmental entity or any
postsecondary education organization or institution in the Commonwealth and may
carry out the employment duties assigned by that entity, organization, or institution.
(8)[(9)] The president shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the council
and shall report and submit annual reports on the strategic implementation plan of
the strategic agenda, carry out policy and program directives of the council, prepare
Page 5 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
and submit to the council for its approval the proposed budget of the council, and
perform all other duties and responsibilities assigned by state law.
(9)[(10)] With approval of the council, the president may enter into agreements with
any state agency or political subdivision of the state, any state postsecondary
education institution, or any other person or entity to enlist staff assistance to
implement the duties and responsibilities under KRS 164.020.
(10)[(11)] The president shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of all assigned duties and responsibilities.
Section 3. KRS 164.020 is amended to read as follows:
The Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky shall:
(1) Develop and implement the strategic agenda[ with the advice and counsel of the
Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education]. The council shall provide for
and direct the planning process and subsequent strategic implementation plans
based on the strategic agenda as provided in KRS 164.0203;
(2) Revise the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan[ with the advice and
counsel of the committee as set forth in KRS 164.004];
(3) Develop a system of public accountability related to the strategic agenda by
evaluating the performance and effectiveness of the state's postsecondary system.
The council shall prepare a report in conjunction with the accountability reporting
described in KRS 164.095, which shall be submitted to [the committee, ]the
Governor[,] and the General Assembly by December 1 annually. This report shall
include a description of contributions by postsecondary institutions to the quality of
elementary and secondary education in the Commonwealth;
(4) Review, revise, and approve the missions of the state's universities and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The Council on
Postsecondary Education shall have the final authority to determine the compliance
of postsecondary institutions with their academic, service, and research missions;
Page 6 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
(5) Establish and ensure that all postsecondary institutions in Kentucky cooperatively
provide for an integrated system of postsecondary education. The council shall
guard against inappropriate and unnecessary conflict and duplication by promoting
transferability of credits and easy access of information among institutions;
(6) Engage in analyses and research to determine the overall needs of postsecondary
education and adult education in the Commonwealth;
(7) Develop plans that may be required by federal legislation. The council shall for all
purposes of federal legislation relating to planning be considered the "single state
agency" as that term may be used in federal legislation. When federal legislation
requires additional representation on any "single state agency," the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall establish advisory groups necessary to satisfy federal
legislative or regulatory guidelines;
(8) (a) Determine tuition and approve the minimum qualifications for admission to
the state postsecondary educational system. In defining residency, the council
shall classify a student as having Kentucky residency if the student met the
residency requirements at the beginning of his or her last year in high school
and enters a Kentucky postsecondary education institution within two (2)
years of high school graduation. In determining the tuition for non-Kentucky
residents, the council shall consider the fees required of Kentucky students by
institutions in adjoining states, the resident fees charged by other states, the
total actual per student cost of training in the institutions for which the fees
are being determined, and the ratios of Kentucky students to non-Kentucky
students comprising the enrollments of the respective institutions, and other
factors the council may in its sole discretion deem pertinent, except that the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System may assess a mandatory
student fee not to exceed eight dollars ($8) per credit hour to be used
exclusively for debt service on amounts not to exceed seventy-five percent
Page 7 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
(75%) of the total projects cost of the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System agency bond projects included in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part
II, J., 11.
(b) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System mandatory fee
established in this subsection shall only be used for debt service on agency
bond projects.
(c) Any fee established as provided by this subsection shall cease to be assessed
upon the retirement of the project bonds for which it services debt.
(d) Prior to the issuance of any bonds, the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall certify in writing to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet that sufficient funds have been raised to meet the
local match equivalent to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total project cost;
(9) Devise, establish, and periodically review and revise policies to be used in making
recommendations to the Governor for consideration in developing
recommendations to the General Assembly for appropriations to the universities,
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and to support strategies
for persons to maintain necessary levels of literacy throughout their lifetimes. The
council has sole discretion, with advice of the [Strategic Committee on
Postsecondary Education and the ]executive officers of the postsecondary education
system, to devise policies that provide for allocation of funds among the
universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(10) Lead and provide staff support for the biennial budget process as provided under
KRS Chapter 48[, in cooperation with the committee];
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, review and approve all
capital construction projects covered by KRS 45.750(1)(f), including real
property acquisitions, and regardless of the source of funding for projects or
acquisitions. Approval of capital projects and real property acquisitions shall
Page 8 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
be on a basis consistent with the strategic agenda and the mission of the
respective universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System.
(b) The organized groups that are establishing community college satellites as
branches of existing community colleges in the counties of Laurel, Leslie, and
Muhlenberg, and that have substantially obtained cash, pledges, real property,
or other commitments to build the satellite at no cost to the Commonwealth,
other than operating costs that shall be paid as part of the operating budget of
the main community college of which the satellite is a branch, are authorized
to begin construction of the satellite on or after January 1, 1998;
(12) Require reports from the executive officer of each institution it deems necessary for
the effectual performance of its duties;
(13) Ensure that the state postsecondary system does not unnecessarily duplicate
services and programs provided by private postsecondary institutions and shall
promote maximum cooperation between the state postsecondary system and private
postsecondary institutions. Receive and consider an annual report prepared by the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities stating the
condition of independent institutions, listing opportunities for more collaboration
between the state and independent institutions and other information as appropriate;
(14) Establish course credit, transfer, and degree components as required in KRS
164.2951;
(15) Define and approve the offering of all postsecondary education technical, associate,
baccalaureate, graduate, and professional degree, certificate, or diploma programs
in the public postsecondary education institutions. The council shall expedite
wherever possible the approval of requests from the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System board of regents relating to new certificate, diploma,
technical, or associate degree programs of a vocational-technical and occupational
Page 9 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
nature. Without the consent of the General Assembly, the council shall not abolish
or limit the total enrollment of the general program offered at any community
college to meet the goal of reasonable access throughout the Commonwealth to a
two (2) year course of general studies designed for transfer to a baccalaureate
program. This does not restrict or limit the authority of the council, as set forth in
this section, to eliminate or make changes in individual programs within that
general program;
(16) Eliminate, in its discretion, existing programs or make any changes in existing
academic programs at the state's postsecondary educational institutions, taking into
consideration these criteria:
(a) Consistency with the institution's mission and the strategic agenda;
(b) Alignment with the priorities in the strategic implementation plan for
achieving the strategic agenda;
(c) Elimination of unnecessary duplication of programs within and among
institutions; and
(d) Efforts to create cooperative programs with other institutions through
traditional means, or by use of distance learning technology and electronic
resources, to achieve effective and efficient program delivery;
(17) Ensure the governing board and faculty of all postsecondary education institutions
are committed to providing instruction free of discrimination against students who
hold political views and opinions contrary to those of the governing board and
faculty;
(18) Review proposals and make recommendations to the Governor regarding the
establishment of new public community colleges, technical institutions, and new
four (4) year colleges;
(19) [Postpone the approval of any new program at a state postsecondary educational
institution, unless the institution has met its equal educational opportunity goals, as
Page 10 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
established by the council. In accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the council, those institutions not meeting the goals shall be able to
obtain a temporary waiver, if the institution has made substantial progress toward
meeting its equal educational opportunity goals;
(20) ]Ensure the coordination, transferability, and connectivity of technology among
postsecondary institutions in the Commonwealth including the development and
implementation of a technology plan as a component of the strategic agenda;
(20)[(21)] Approve the teacher education programs in the public institutions that comply
with standards established by the Education Professional Standards Board pursuant
to KRS 161.028;
(21)[(22)] Constitute the representative agency of the Commonwealth in all matters of
postsecondary education of a general and statewide nature which are not otherwise
delegated to one (1) or more institutions of postsecondary learning. The
responsibility may be exercised through appropriate contractual relationships with
individuals or agencies located within or without the Commonwealth. The authority
includes but is not limited to contractual arrangements for programs of research,
specialized training, and cultural enrichment;
(22)[(23)] Maintain procedures for the approval of a designated receiver to provide for
the maintenance of student records of the public institutions of higher education and
the colleges as defined in KRS 164.945, and institutions operating pursuant to KRS
165A.310 which offer collegiate level courses for academic credit, which cease to
operate. Procedures shall include assurances that, upon proper request, subject to
federal and state laws and regulations, copies of student records shall be made
available within a reasonable length of time for a minimum fee;
(23)[(24)] Monitor and transmit a report on compliance with KRS 164.351 to the
director of the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim
Joint Committee on Families and Children;
Page 11 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
(24)[(25)] (a) Develop in cooperation with each public university and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System a comprehensive orientation and
education program for new members of the council and the governing boards
and continuing education opportunities for all council and board members.
For new members of the council and institutional governing boards, the
council shall:
1. Ensure that the orientation and education program comprises six (6)
hours of instruction time and includes but is not limited to information
concerning the roles of the council and governing board members, the
strategic agenda and the strategic implementation plan, and the
respective institution's mission, budget and finances, strategic plans and
priorities, institutional policies and procedures, board fiduciary
responsibilities, legal considerations including open records and open
meetings requirements, ethical considerations arising from board
membership, and the board member removal and replacement
provisions of KRS 63.080;
2. Establish delivery methods by which the orientation and education
program can be completed in person or electronically by new members
within one (1) year of their appointment or election;
3. Provide an annual report to the Governor and Legislative Research
Commission of those new board members who do not complete the
required orientation and education program; and
4. Invite governing board members of private colleges and universities
licensed by the Council on Postsecondary Education to participate in the
orientation and education program described in this subsection;
(b) Offer, in cooperation with the public universities and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System, continuing education
Page 12 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
opportunities for all council and governing board members; and
(c) Review and approve the orientation programs of each public university and
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for their governing
board members to ensure that all programs and information adhere to this
subsection;
(25)[(26)] Develop a financial reporting procedure to be used by all state postsecondary
education institutions to ensure uniformity of financial information available to
state agencies and the public;
(26)[(27)] Select and appoint a president of the council under KRS 164.013;
(27)[(28)] Employ consultants and other persons and employees as may be required for
the council's operations, functions, and responsibilities;
(28)[(29)] Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
governing its powers, duties, and responsibilities as described in this section;
(29)[(30)] Prepare and present by January 31 of each year an annual status report on
postsecondary education in the Commonwealth to the Governor[, the Strategic
Committee on Postsecondary Education,] and the Legislative Research
Commission;
(30)[(31)] Consider the role, function, and capacity of independent institutions of
postsecondary education in developing policies to meet the immediate and future
needs of the state. When it is found that independent institutions can meet state
needs effectively, state resources may be used to contract with or otherwise assist
independent institutions in meeting these needs;
(31)[(32)] Create advisory groups representing the presidents, faculty, nonteaching staff,
and students of the public postsecondary education system and the independent
colleges and universities;
(32)[(33)] Develop a statewide policy to promote employee and faculty development in
state and locally operated secondary area technology centers through the waiver of
Page 13 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
tuition for college credit coursework in the public postsecondary education system.
Any regular full-time employee of a state or locally operated secondary area
technology center may, with prior administrative approval of the course offering
institution, take a maximum of six (6) credit hours per term at any public
postsecondary institution. The institution shall waive the tuition up to a maximum
of six (6) credit hours per term. The employee shall complete the Free Application
for Federal Student Aid to determine the level of need and eligibility for state and
federal financial aid programs. The amount of tuition waived shall not exceed the
cost of tuition at the institution less any state or federal grants received, which shall
be credited first to the student's tuition;
(33)[(34)] Participate with the Kentucky Department of Education, the Kentucky Board
of Education, and postsecondary education institutions to ensure that academic
content requirements for successful entry into postsecondary education programs
are aligned with high school content standards and that students who master the
high school academic content standards shall not need remedial courses. The
council shall monitor the results on an ongoing basis;
(34)[(35)] Cooperate with the Kentucky Department of Education and the Education
Professional Standards Board in providing information sessions to selected
postsecondary education content faculty and teacher educators of the high school
academic content standards as required under KRS 158.6453(2)(l);
(35)[(36)] Cooperate with the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics and ensure the
participation of the public institutions as required in KRS 151B.133;
(36)[(37)] Pursuant to KRS 63.080, review written notices from the Governor or from a
board of trustees or board of regents concerning removal of a board member or the
entire appointed membership of a board, investigate the member or board and the
conduct alleged to support removal, and make written recommendations to the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission as to whether the member or
Page 14 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
board should be removed; and
(37)[(38)] Exercise any other powers, duties, and responsibilities necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant the
Council on Postsecondary Education authority to disestablish or eliminate any
college of law which became a part of the state system of higher education through
merger with a state college.
Section 4. KRS 164.0211 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Board of Student Body Presidents is hereby created as an advisory board and
shall be attached to the Council on Postsecondary Education for administration
and organization purposes.
(2) The board shall consist of the student body president of each four (4) year public
university, [the ]two (2) student regents to be designated by the board of regents of
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and one (1) student body
president representing the members of the Association of Independent Kentucky
Colleges and Universities[ shall serve on an advisory board to be known as the
Board of Student Body Presidents]. The student body president representing the
independent colleges and universities shall be selected under a process established
by the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities.
(3)[(2)] The Board of Student Body Presidents shall advise the legislative and
executive branches regarding postsecondary education issues and concerns of
students.
(4)[(3)] At least once each year, the Board of Student Body Presidents shall meet with
the Council on Postsecondary Education and the Advisory Conference of
Presidents.
(5)[(4)] The Board of Student Body Presidents shall submit the names of three (3)
nominees to the Governor for consideration in the appointment of a student member
to the Council on Postsecondary Education pursuant to KRS 164.011.
Page 15 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
Section 5. KRS 164.321 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Eastern Kentucky University, Morehead State University, Murray State
University, Western Kentucky University, Kentucky State University,
Northern Kentucky University, and the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall each be governed by a board of regents appointed for a
term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky.
(b)[(a)] Each board of the comprehensive universities shall consist of eight (8)
members appointed by the Governor, one (1) member of the teaching faculty,
one (1) member of the university nonteaching personnel, and one (1) member
of the student body of the respective university or college. The members
appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The
members of the board shall select a chairperson annually.
(c)[(b)] The board of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
shall consist of eight (8) members appointed by the Governor, two (2)
members of the teaching faculty, two (2) members of the nonteaching
personnel, and two (2) members of the student body. The members appointed
by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
1. No more than three (3) appointed members of the board shall reside in
any one (1) judicial district of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the
date of the appointment.
2. A change in residency of a gubernatorial appointee after the date of
appointment shall not affect the appointee's ability to serve or eligibility
for reappointment, except an appointee who assumes residency outside
the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible to serve.
The Council on Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of
his or her ineligibility to serve.
3. In making initial appointments, the Governor shall act so as to provide
Page 16 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
equal representation of the two (2) sexes. In filling vacancies, the
Governor shall act so as to provide, inasmuch as possible, equal
representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex
that is the lesser represented at the time of the appointment. If the
remaining membership already has an equal number of males and
females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex.
(2) The terms of appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the
Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4). [, except the initial
appointments to the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System shall be as follows:
(a) One (1) member shall serve a one (1) year term;
(b) One (1) member shall serve a two (2) year term;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) One (1) member shall serve a four (4) year term;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) Two (2) members shall serve six (6) year terms.
]New appointees of a board of regents shall not serve for more than two (2)
consecutive terms.
(3) The gubernatorial appointments may include one (1) graduate of the respective
institution who resides outside the Commonwealth. Not more than two (2)
appointed members of any board shall be residents of one (1) county. The
appointments shall reflect the proportional representation of the two (2) leading
political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the
political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the
date of his or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall not be a
prerequisite to appointment to any board generally; however, if any person is
Page 17 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
appointed to a board that does not represent either of the two (2) leading political
parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political affiliation
requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number of
members on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2)
leading political parties. Membership on the board shall reflect no less than
proportional representation of the minority racial composition of the
Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the most recent
census or estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If the determination
of proportional minority representation does not result in a whole number of
minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole number. Membership
on the board shall not be incompatible with any state office. A change in residency
after the date of appointment shall not affect a member's ability to serve nor shall it
prevent a member's eligibility for reappointment, except a member who assumes
residency outside the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible
to serve. The Council on Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of his
or her ineligibility to serve.
(4) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner and within the
same time after the occurrence of the vacancy as regular appointments. The person
appointed shall hold the position for the unexpired term only.
(5) Each member of the board shall serve for the term for which the member is
appointed and until a successor is appointed and qualified, unless a member is
removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4).
(6) (a) The faculty member of a comprehensive university shall be a teaching or
research member of the faculty of his or her respective university of the rank
of assistant professor or above. The faculty member shall be elected by secret
ballot by all faculty members of his or her university of the rank of instructor,
assistant professor, or above. The faculty member shall serve for a term of
Page 18 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
three (3) years and until his successor is elected and qualified. The faculty
member shall be eligible for reelection, but he or she shall not be eligible to
continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases being a member
of the teaching staff of the university. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for
the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election.
(b) The faculty members of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System shall be represented by one (1) faculty member elected from the
community colleges and one (1) faculty member elected from the technical
institutions to serve three (3) year terms and until their successors are named.
The faculty representative of each branch shall be elected by means of a
process established by the board. The faculty members may be reelected but
shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A faculty member shall
be ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases
to be a member of the faculty at one (1) of the institutions within the system.
Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner
as provided for the original election. These two (2) members shall collectively
have one (1) vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member.
(7) (a) The nonteaching personnel member in a comprehensive university shall be
any full-time staff member excluding the president, vice presidents, academic
deans, and academic department chairpersons. He or she shall represent all
nonteaching university employees including, but not limited to, building
facilities and clerical personnel. The member shall be elected by secret ballot
by the nonteaching employees. The nonteaching personnel member shall
serve a term of three (3) years and until a successor is elected and qualified.
The nonteaching personnel member shall be eligible for reelection, but he or
she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or
she ceases being an employee of the university. Elections to fill vacancies
Page 19 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the
original election.
(b) The nonteaching personnel members in the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System shall be any full-time staff member excluding a
president, chancellor, vice president, academic dean, academic department
chair, or other administrator. They shall represent all nonteaching employees
in their respective branch institutions including, but not limited to, support
and clerical personnel. One (1) member shall be a representative from the
community colleges and one (1) member shall be a representative from the
technical institutions. They shall serve three (3) year terms and until their
successors are named. These two (2) members shall collectively have one (1)
vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member. The nonteaching
personnel members of each branch shall be elected by means of a process
established by the board. A nonteaching personnel member may be reelected
but shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A nonteaching
employee shall be ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if
that employee ceases to be a nonteaching employee at one (1) of the
institutions within the system. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the
unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election.
(8) (a) The student member on a comprehensive university board shall serve a one
(1) year term beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as student
body president and ending on the following June 30. If the student member
does not maintain the position as student body president or the status as a full-
time student at any time during that academic year, a special election shall be
held to select a full-time student member. The elected student member shall
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) Two (2) full-time student members shall be elected to the board of regents for
Page 20 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System. One (1) shall
represent students of the community colleges and one (1) shall represent the
technical institutions. The student members shall be elected by means of a
process established by the board. The student members shall serve one (1)
year terms beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as a student
member of the board and ending on the following June 30. If the student
member does not maintain the status as a full-time student, a special election
shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. The
two (2) members shall collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast one-
half (1/2) vote by each member.
(9) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an
orientation and education program prescribed by the council under KRS
164.020(24)[(25)], as a condition of their service and eligibility for appointment or
election to a second term.
(10) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following
circumstances:
(a) For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
(b) Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(11) The inability of the board or boards of the comprehensive universities or Kentucky
Community and Technical College System to hold quarterly meetings, to elect a
chairperson annually, to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set
tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of the president of the university or
system, to carry out its primary function to periodically evaluate the university's or
system's progress in implementing its mission, goals, and objectives to conform to
the strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties under KRS 164.350 shall be
cause for the Governor to remove all appointed members of the board or boards and
replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Page 21 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
Section 6. KRS 15.257 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of the Attorney General shall, within ninety (90) days of June 20, 2005,
and thereafter, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of any legislation
amending the provisions of the Open Meetings Act or the Open Records Act,
distribute to all county judge/executives, mayors, county attorneys, city attorneys,
superintendents of public school districts, presidents of each of the state public
postsecondary education institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or
164.001(12) or (16)[(13) or (17)], and attorneys of public school districts and public
postsecondary education institutions throughout Kentucky written information
prepared by the Office of the Attorney General that explains the procedural and
substantive provisions of the Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850, and the
Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884, together with the information required
by KRS 171.223 to be prepared by the Department for Libraries and Archives
concerning proper retention and management of public records. This distribution
may be by electronic means.
(2) All superintendents of public school districts and the presidents of each of the state
public postsecondary education institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or
164.001(12) or (16)[(13) or (17)] shall be responsible for designating and
submitting the names and addresses of the attorneys to whom this information shall
be disseminated to the Office of the Attorney General.
Section 7. KRS 164.011 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established a Council on Postsecondary Education in
Kentucky as an agency, instrumentality, and political subdivision of the
Commonwealth and a public body corporate and politic having all powers, duties,
and responsibilities as are provided to it by law, appointed for a term set by law
pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The council shall be
composed of the commissioner of education, a faculty member, a student member,
Page 22 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
and thirteen (13) citizen members appointed by the Governor. The citizen members
shall be confirmed by the Senate under KRS 11.160, and the commissioner of
education shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. Citizen council members
shall be selected from a list of nominees provided to the Governor under the
nominating process set forth in KRS 164.005. If the General Assembly is not in
session at the time of the appointment, persons appointed shall serve prior to
confirmation, but the Governor shall seek the consent of the Senate at the next
regular session or at an intervening extraordinary session if the matter is included in
the call of the General Assembly.
(2) By no later than thirty (30) days after May 30, 1997, the Governor's Postsecondary
Education Nominating Committee shall submit nominations to the Governor as set
forth in KRS 164.005. On making appointments to the council, the Governor shall
ensure broad geographical and political representation; ensure equal representation
of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; ensure no less than proportional
representation of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth based
on the state's voter registration and the political affiliation of each appointee as of
December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her appointment; and ensure
that appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth
based on the total minority racial population using the most recent census or
estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If the determination of
proportional minority representation does not result in a whole number of minority
members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole number. A particular political
affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to the council generally;
however, if any person is appointed to the council that does not represent either of
the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional
representation by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied
based on the total number of members on the council less any members not
Page 23 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political parties. In filling vacancies to
the council, the Governor shall act so as to provide, inasmuch as possible, equal
representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex that is the
lesser represented at the time of the appointment. If the remaining membership
already has an equal number of males and females, the Governor may appoint a
member of either sex. No more than two (2) members of the council shall hold an
undergraduate degree from any one (1) Kentucky university, and no more than
three (3) voting members of the council shall reside in any one (1) judicial district
of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the date of the appointment. However, change
in residency after the date of appointment shall not affect the ability to serve.
(3) One (1) member shall be a full-time faculty member employed at a state institution
of postsecondary education. The faculty member shall be appointed to a four (4)
year term by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees selected and submitted
by majority vote of the ten (10) faculty members who serve as faculty
representatives of the boards of trustees and boards of regents of the nine (9)
postsecondary education institutions.
(4) One (1) member shall be enrolled as a full-time student at a state institution of
postsecondary education and shall be selected annually in the following manner:
not later than June 1 of each year the eight (8) student body presidents of the four
(4) year state public institutions of higher education, the two (2) student members to
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and one (1) student body
president representing the members of the Association of Independent Kentucky
Colleges and Universities shall elect by majority vote three (3) nominees to submit
to the Governor. From this list of nominees, the Governor shall appoint a student
member.
(5) In filling any vacancies, the Governor shall ensure the continuing representation
upon the council of the broad constituencies as set forth in subsection (2) of this
Page 24 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
section. Vacancies on the council shall be filled for the unexpired term in
accordance with the procedures established for the original appointments.
(6) Each citizen member shall serve a term of six (6) years unless removed by the
Governor for cause[, except the initial appointments shall be as follows:
(a) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 1997;
(b) Three (3) appointments shall expire December 31, 1998;
(c) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 1999;
(d) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2000;
(e) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2001; and
(f) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2002].
(7) Any person, other than the chief state school officer, holding either an elective or
appointive state office or who is a member of the governing board of any state
university in Kentucky, shall be ineligible for membership or appointment on the
council during his term.
(8) The members of the council shall elect the chair and the vice chair of the council
from among the council's membership, and the chair and vice chair shall serve at
the pleasure of the council. The vice chair shall serve as chair in the absence of the
chair.
(9) The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon the call of the chair
or a majority of the council.
(10) A quorum shall be a majority of the appointive membership of the council.
(11) A quorum shall be required to organize and conduct the business of the council,
except that an affirmative vote of eight (8) or more appointive members of the
entire council shall be required to dismiss from employment the president of the
council, and to adopt or amend the state strategic postsecondary education agenda.
(12) New appointees to the council shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(13) New appointees to the council shall complete an orientation and education program
Page 25 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
set forth in KRS 164.020(24)[(25)] to be eligible for appointment to a second term.
Section 8. KRS 164.131 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The government of the University of Kentucky is vested in a board of trustees
appointed for a term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of
Kentucky.
(b) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an
orientation and education program prescribed by the council under KRS
164.020(24)[(25)], as a condition of their service and eligibility for
appointment or election to a second term.
(c) The board shall periodically evaluate the institution's progress in
implementing its missions, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic
agenda. Officers and officials shall be held accountable for the status of the
institution's progress.
(d) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following
circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(e) The board shall consist of sixteen (16) members appointed by the Governor,
two (2) members of the faculty of the University of Kentucky, one (1)
member of the University of Kentucky nonteaching personnel, and one (1)
member of the student body of the University of Kentucky. The members
appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The
voting members of the board shall select a chairperson annually.
(2) (a) The terms of the appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the
Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4), except the initial
appointments shall be as follows:
Page 26 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
1. Two (2) members shall serve one (1) year terms;
2. Two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms, one (1) of whom shall
be a graduate of the university, selected from a list of three (3) names
submitted by the alumni of the university according to rules established
by the board of trustees;
3. Three (3) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
4. Three (3) members shall serve four (4) year terms, one (1) of whom
shall be a graduate of the university, selected as under subparagraph 2.
of this subsection;
5. Three (3) members shall serve five (5) year terms; and
6. Three (3) members shall serve six (6) year terms, one (1) of whom shall
be a graduate of the university, selected as under subparagraph 2. of this
subsection.
(b) 1. Three (3) of the appointments shall be graduates of the university and
may include one (1) graduate of the institution who resides outside the
Commonwealth;
2. Three (3) shall be representative of agricultural interests; and
3. Ten (10) shall be other distinguished citizens representative of the
learned professions and may include one (1) who resides outside of
Kentucky.
(c) The Governor shall make the appointments so as to reflect proportional
representation of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth
based on the state's voter registration and the political affiliation of each
appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her
appointment, and to reflect no less than proportional representation of the
minority racial composition of the Commonwealth based on the total minority
racial population using the most recent census or estimate data from the
Page 27 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
United States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority
representation does not result in a whole number of minority members, it shall
be rounded up to the next whole number. A particular political affiliation shall
not be a prerequisite to appointment to the board generally; however, if any
person is appointed to the board that does not represent either of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation
by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on
the total number of members on the board less any members not affiliated
with either of the two (2) leading political parties.
(d) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made for the unexpired term in the
same manner as provided for the original appointments.
(3) The two (2) University of Kentucky faculty members shall be of the rank of
assistant professor or above. They shall be elected by secret ballot by all University
of Kentucky faculty members of the rank of assistant professor or above. Faculty
members shall serve for terms of three (3) years and until their successors are
elected and qualified. Faculty members shall be eligible for reelection, but they
shall be ineligible to continue to serve as members of the board of trustees if they
cease to be members of the faculty of the university. Elections to fill vacancies shall
be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for original elections.
(4) The nonteaching personnel member shall be any full-time staff member, excluding
the president, vice-presidents, academic deans, and academic department
chairpersons. The staff member shall represent all nonteaching university
employees, including but not limited to building facilities and clerical personnel.
The staff member shall be elected by secret ballot by the nonteaching employees.
The staff member shall serve a term of three (3) years and until a successor is
elected and qualified. The staff member shall be eligible for reelection, but a staff
member who ceases being an employee of the university shall not be eligible to
Page 28 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
continue to serve as a member of the board. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for
the unexpired term and shall be held in the same manner as provided for the
original election.
(5) The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being
elected and sworn in as student body president and ending on the following June
30. If the student member does not maintain the position of student body president
or the status of a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a special
election shall be held to select a full-time student member. The elected student
member shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(6) The number of student and employee trustees of the University of Kentucky elected
to the board shall not exceed four (4).
(7) Unless specifically approved by the board of trustees under the provisions of KRS
164.367, no member of the administrative staff of the university shall be directly or
indirectly interested in any contract with the university for the sale of property,
materials, supplies, equipment, or services, with exception of compensation to the
two (2) faculty members, and the one (1) nonteaching personnel member.
(8) New appointees of the board shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(9) The inability of the board to hold regular meetings, to elect a chairperson annually,
to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an
annual evaluation of the president of the university, or to carry out its primary
function to periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its
mission, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda shall be cause for
the Governor to remove all appointed members of the board and replace the entire
appointed membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Section 9. KRS 164.2843 is amended to read as follows:
Each institution of the postsecondary education system, as defined in KRS 164.001[(17)],
that provides in-state tuition for nonresident children of graduates may provide the same
Page 29 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
in-state tuition for nonresident siblings of graduates.
Section 10. KRS 164.465 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The presidents of state postsecondary education institutions identified in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or 164.001(12) or (16)[(13) or (17)] shall distribute the written
information provided by the Office of the Attorney General and the Department for
Libraries and Archives under KRS 15.257 and 171.223 to each board of regents or
governing board member of their university. Distribution shall be accomplished
within sixty (60) days of receiving the written information from the Office of the
Attorney General and the Department for Libraries and Archives. Distribution to
newly appointed members shall be accomplished within sixty (60) days of their
appointment. The distribution may be by electronic means.
(2) The presidents of state public postsecondary education institutions, as identified in
subsection (1) of this section, shall require signatory proof that each board of
regents or governing board member has received the written information as
required under subsection (1) of this section, shall maintain documentation of
receipt on file, and shall certify to the Office of the Attorney General that the
written information has been distributed as required.
Section 11. KRS 164.821 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The government of the University of Louisville is vested in a board of trustees
appointed for a term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of
Kentucky. The board shall consist of ten (10) members appointed by the Governor,
at least one (1) of whom shall be a graduate of the university; one (1) member of
the teaching faculty of the University of Louisville who shall be the chief executive
of the ranking unit of faculty government; one (1) member of the permanent staff of
the University of Louisville who shall be the chief executive of the staff senate; and
one (1) student member who shall be the president of the student body during the
appropriate academic year. The members appointed by the Governor shall be
Page 30 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(a) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an
orientation and education program prescribed by the council under KRS
164.020(24)[(25)], as a condition of their service and eligibility for
appointment or election to a second term.
(b) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following
circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(c) New appointees to the board shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive
terms.
(2) The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being
elected and sworn in as student body president and ending on the following June
30. If the student member does not maintain the position of student body president
or the status of a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a special
election shall be held to select a full-time student member. The elected student
member shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The faculty member and staff member shall serve one (1) year terms and cease to
be eligible for membership on the board of trustees upon termination of their
respective relationships with, or leadership positions within, the university, and
vacancies occurring for this reason shall be filled for the remainder of the respective
terms in the same manner.
(4) The gubernatorial appointments shall serve a term of six (6) years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the
Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4)[, except the initial terms shall be as
follows:
(a) Two (2) members shall serve one (1) year terms;
Page 31 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
(b) Two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) Two (2) members shall serve four (4) year terms;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) One (1) member shall serve a six (6) year term].
(5) The Governor shall make [his ]at-large appointments so as to divide the appointed
representation upon the board to reflect:
(a) The proportional representation of the two (2) leading political parties in the
Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the political
affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date
of his or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall not be a
prerequisite to appointment to the board generally; however, if any person is
appointed to the board that does not represent either of the two (2) leading
political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation by
political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the
total number of members on the board less any members not affiliated with
either of the two (2) leading political parties; and
(b) No less than the proportional representation of the minority racial composition
of the Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the
most recent census or estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If
the determination of proportional minority representation does not result in a
whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole
number.
(6) Vacancies among the appointed members of the board occurring by death,
resignation, or any other cause, other than expiration of a term, shall be filled by
appointments made by the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term,
subject to the qualifications set forth in this section.
Page 32 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 711/GA
(7) Unless specifically approved by the board of trustees under the provisions of KRS
164.367, no member of the teaching or administrative staff of the university shall be
directly or indirectly interested in any contract with the university for the sale of
property, materials, supplies, equipment, or services, with the exception of
compensation to the faculty, staff, and student members.
(8) The inability of the board to hold regular meetings, to elect a chairperson annually,
to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an
annual evaluation of the president of the university, to carry out its primary function
to periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its mission, goals,
and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties
under KRS 164.830 shall be cause for the Governor to remove all appointed
members of the board and replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to
KRS 63.080(4).
Section 12. The following KRS sections are repealed:
164.004 Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education.
164.0285 Definitions for KRS 164.0285 to 164.0288.
164.0286 STEM Initiative Task Force -- Purpose -- Membership -- Steering committee
oversight and coordination -- Administrative attachment -- Contracting -- Funding.
164.0287 Duties of STEM Initiative Task Force -- Strategic plan -- Business plan.
164.0288 Kentucky STEM Initiative fund.
164.033 Local P-16 councils.
Page 33 of 33
HB071110.100 - 272 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:19 PM GA